Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2251.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 18-114.16 of Title 70, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, each school
district shall provide to every classroom teacher a salary increase
of twenty percent (20%) over the base amount the employee earned
during the 2024-2025 school year if the classroom teacher is
employed by the same school district for the 2025-2026 school year.
If a classroom teacher is a new employee of the school district, his
or her starting salary shall be a twenty-percent increase from the

Req. No. 11711 Page 1

star ting salary for the same position during the 2024-2025 school
year.
B. The increase prescribed by this section shall be in addition
to any other compensation, increase in compensation, and fringe
benefits provided by the school district or state, or mandated by
law or collective bargaining agreement, unless the hours or duties
of the classroom teacher are reduced proportionately.
C. For purposes of this section, "classroom teacher" means a
teacher as defined in paragraph 1 of Section 1-116 of Title 70 of
the Oklahoma Statutes, except for superintendents as defined in
paragraph 2 of Section 1-116 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-11711 AQH 12/09/24






Req. No. 11711 Page 2